Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2031.01
Retirement system; reemployment; election to repay system; amount; status; exception.

From January 1, 1991, to June 30, 1991, any person who withdrew his or her accumulated contributions pursuant to subsection (1) of section 81-2031 prior to January 1, 1991, and has again become an employee of the Nebraska State Patrol may elect to repay the retirement system for any number of years of service which he or she accumulated prior to withdrawing his or her accumulated contributions. The amount to be repaid shall not exceed the amount of the withdrawal for the years of service for which the repayment is being made plus the interest which would have accrued on that amount under the retirement system. Any person who repays such amount shall be restored to the same status for the years of service for which repayment is made as he or she had prior to the withdrawal of the accumulated contributions. This section shall not apply to employees of the Nebraska State Patrol retiring prior to January 1, 1991.

Laws 1990, LB 1105, § 1.